South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4611.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 8-11-150 (A) and (B) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) For the purposes of this section: (1) "Child" means a newborn biological child or foster of a child in state custody and under the age of eighteen. No child can have more than two parents eligible for paid parental leave. (2) "Eligible state employee" means an employee occupying any percentage of a full-time equivalent position. (3) "Paid parental leave" means six weeks of paid leave at one hundred percent of the eligible state employee's base pay or two weeks of paid leave at one hundred percent of the eligible state employee's base pay. Leave for part-time eligible state employees must be on a prorated basis corresponding to the percentage of hours they are normally scheduled to work. (4) "Qualifying event" means the birth of a newborn biological child or stillbirth to an eligible state employee or after a co-parent's birth of a newborn child, stillbirth, or fostering a child in state custody. (5) "Stillbirth" has the same meaning as defined in Section 44-63-55. (B) Eligible state employees who are employed by this State, its departments, agencies, or institutions and who give birth or stillbirth are entitled to receive six weeks of paid parental leave. Other eligible state employees who do not give birth are entitled to receive two weeks of paid parental leave. SECTION 2.  Section 8-11-151(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) For the purposes of this section: (1) "Child" means a newborn biological child or foster of a child in state custody and under the age of eighteen. No child can have more than two parents eligible for paid parental leave. (2) "Eligible school district employee" means an employee defined by the Department of Education using the Professional Certified Staff system or any full-time equivalent position categorized as classified staff. (3) "Paid parental leave," for the purpose of duration and percentage of base pay covered, has the same meaning as Section 8-11-150(3) for eligible school district employees. (4) "Qualifying event" means the birth of a newborn biological child or stillbirth to an eligible school district employee or after a coparent's birth of a newborn child, stillbirth, or fostering a child in state custody. (5) "Stillbirth" has the same meaning as defined in Section 44-63-55. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----